Hawaii statutes.
§327K-3 Immunity. (a) No physician,
advanced practice registered nurse, health care professional, nurse's aide,
hospice provider, home care provider, including private duty and medicare home
health providers, emergency medical services provider, adult residential care
home operator, skilled nursing facility operator, hospital, or person employed
by or under contract with a hospital shall be subject to criminal prosecution,
civil liability, or be deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct for:

(1) Carrying out in good faith, a decision regarding
treatment orders, including cardiopulmonary resuscitation by or on behalf of a
patient pursuant to orders in a form and in compliance with the standards and
procedures set forth in this chapter; or

(2) Providing cardiopulmonary resuscitation to a
patient for whom an order not to resuscitate has been issued on a form;
provided the person reasonably and in good faith:

(A) Was unaware of the issuance of an order
not to resuscitate; or

(B) Believed that any consent to treatment
orders, including the order not to resuscitate, had been revoked or canceled.

(b) No person shall be subject to criminal
prosecution or civil liability for consenting or declining to consent, in good
faith and on behalf of a patient, to the issuance of an order not to
resuscitate pursuant to this chapter. [L 2009, c 186, pt of §1; am L 2014, c
154, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next